Utah statutes.
16-16-1210.   Court proceeding.
(1)  Upon application by a dissolved limited cooperative association that has
published a notice under Section 16-16-1209, the district court in the county
where the association's principal office is located or, if the association
does not have a principal office in this state where its designated office in
this state is located, may determine the amount and form of security to be
provided for payment of claims against the association that are contingent,
have not been made known to the association, or are based on an event
occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts
known to the association, are reasonably anticipated to arise after the
effective date of dissolution.
(2)  Not later than 10 days after filing an application under Subsection (1),
a dissolved limited cooperative association shall give notice of the
proceeding to each known claimant holding a contingent claim.
(3)  The court may appoint a representative in a proceeding brought under this
section to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown.  The
dissolved limited cooperative association shall pay reasonable fees and
expenses of the representative, including all reasonable attorney and expert
witness fees.
(4)  Provision by the dissolved limited cooperative association for security
in the amount and the form ordered by the court satisfies the association's
obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made
known to the association, or are based on an event occurring after the
effective date of dissolution, and the claims may not be enforced against a
member that received a distribution.
